Hawaii statutes.
§432D-17 Fees. (a) The commissioner
shall collect, in advance, the following fees:

(1) Certificate of authority:

(A) Application for a certificate of
authority: $900; and

(B) Issuance of certificate of authority:
$600; and

(2) For all services subsequent to the issuance of
certificate of authority, including extension of the certificate of authority:
$600 per year.

(b) No certificate of authority shall contain
an expiration date, but all certificates of authority shall be extended by the
commissioner from time to time in order to continue to be valid. When the
commissioner issues or extends a certificate of authority, the commissioner
shall determine the date prior to which the certificate of authority shall be
extended and shall so notify the insurer in writing. This date is called the
extension date. The extension date shall be any date not less than one year
and not more than three years after date of issue or extension of the
certificate of authority. If the insurer qualifies, its certificate of
authority shall be extended. The commissioner shall provide each holder of a
certificate of authority at least thirty days' advance written notice of the
applicable extension date. If the fee for the extension of the certificate of
authority is not paid before or on the extension date, a penalty shall be
imposed in the amount of fifty per cent of the fee. The commissioner shall
provide notice in writing of the delinquency of extension and the imposition of
the authorized penalty. If the fee and the penalty are not paid within thirty
days immediately following the date of the notice of delinquency, the
commissioner may revoke the certificate of authority and may not reinstate the
certificate of authority until the fee and penalty have been paid.

(c) All fees and penalties collected pursuant
to this section and penalties collected pursuant to section 432D-14 shall be
deposited to the credit of the compliance resolution fund. [L 1995, c 179, pt
of §1; am L 1999, c 247, §2; am L 2012, c 251, §13; am L 2015, c 63, §18]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next